North Dakota, session 69, HB1231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. Section 12.1-32-15.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
12.1 - 32 - 15.1. Petition for relief from registration requirement .
1. As used in this section, "sexual offender" has the same meaning provided in section
12.1 - 32 - 15 .
2. After seven years of registration, a sexual offender assigned a low - risk level by the
attorney general may petition the sentencing court or the district court for the district in
which the offender resides for an order relieving the offender of the duty to register.
3. The petition must be served on the state's attorney in the county in which the petition
is filed. Before a hearing on the petition, the state's attorney shall mail a copy of the
petition to the victim of the last offense for which the sexual offender was convicted if
the victim's address is reasonably available. The court shall consider any written or
oral statements of the victim. The court may grant the petition on finding that:
a. The sexual offender has maintained a clean record during the offender's period of
registration; and
b. Continued registration is not necessary for public protection and that relief from
registration is in the best interests of society.
Page No. 1 25.0275.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
4. A finding that the sexual offender has maintained a clean record means during the
period the sexual offender was required to register as a sexual offender, the offender:
a. Was not convicted of a felony offense;
b. Was not convicted of a sexual offense;
c. Successfully completed, without revocation, a period of supervised release,
probation, or parole; and
d. Has successfully completed any cour t - ordered sexual offender treatmen t
program and any other court-ordered treatment program, if any. This subdivision
applies to any sexual offender treatment program completed regardless of
whether the program was completed while the sexual offender was incarcerated,
released, on parole, or on probation.
SECTION 2. APPLICATION. This Act applies to a sexual offender who has complied with
the registration requirements under section 12.1-32-15 for at least seven years before the
effective date of this Act or who reaches seven years of compliance after the effective date of
this Act.
Page No. 2 25.0275.03000